Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Fire Protection Districts

§ 35-9-201.
Applicability; powers of districts generally.

This act [§§

35-9-201

through

35-9-215

] shall apply to a fire protection district created under the provisions of this act or under the provisions of article 1, chapter 45, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945, as amended. Such fire protection district is hereby authorized to provide protection from fire and other public safety emergencies for all persons and property within its boundaries, and to contract, including mutual aid agreements, to give or receive such protection to or from one (1) or more other municipal corporations, other fire protection districts, private organizations or individuals. No fire protection district is liable for damages to persons or property resulting from the operation or presence of fire fighting equipment outside the district boundaries pursuant to an agreement or contract under this section. Entry into an agreement or contract pursuant to this section does not create a new or reorganized taxing entity as provided in W.S. 39-13-104(m).

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-437; Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 1; 2007, ch. 29, § 1; 2008, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “and other public safety emergencies,” “including mutual aid agreements,” “other fire protection districts,” and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence.

The 2008 amendment,

added the last sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 56 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Article 1, ch. 45, W.C.S. 1945, referred to in this section, was repealed by § 13, ch. 147, Laws 1953.

Laws 2008, ch. 56, § 2 provides: “This act shall apply to all ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on any property on and after January 1, 2008.”

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 35-9-202.
Election of board of directors.

The election of the initial board of directors shall be held by the board of county commissioners at the same time as the election for formation of the district, or at the next general election in the case of a district created pursuant to W.S.

35-9-213

. There shall be elected a board of directors consisting of either three (3) or five (5) members, the number of which is to be designated by the county commissioners pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, who are residents living within the district who shall serve without compensation. Within ten (10) days after each election the board shall meet and select a president and a secretary-treasurer. The first elected board shall serve until the next director election as provided in W.S.

22-29-112

. At the first director election of a three (3) member board, one (1) member of the board shall be elected for two (2) years, and two (2) members for four (4) years, for staggered terms. Thereafter, directors shall be elected for four (4) year terms. At the first director election of a five (5) member board, two (2) members of the board shall be elected for two (2) years and three (3) members for four (4) years. Biennial elections shall be held in accordance with the Special District Election Act of 1994.

The board is authorized to:

Increase the number of directors to five (5) when the assessed valuation of the property of the district exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000.00);

Divide the district into director districts and provide for the election of a director from each director district to be chosen by all voters of the fire protection district. The board may provide for district directors to be apportioned in any combination of single member, multi-member or at-large representation; and

Fix the initial term of the additional directors so that the term of not more than three (3) directors shall expire in any one (1) year.

Director districts and biennial elections shall be approved by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the district is located.

Directors are subject to the conflict of interest disclosure requirements of W.S.

6-5-106

and

16-6-118

.

The board of county commissioners may provide for the election of an initial board of directors with five (5) members if the assessed valuation of property of the district exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000.00) at the time the district is formed.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 35-438; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1993, ch. 26, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 10, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2007, ch. 146, § 2; 2017 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a) inserted “, or at the next general election in the case of a district created pursuant to W.S.

35-9-213

” in the first sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “either three (3) or five (5) members, the number of which is to be designated by the county commissioners pursuant to subsection (e) of this section” in the second sentence, “of a three (3) member board” in the fifth sentence, and “At the first director election of a five (5) member board, two (2) members of the board shall be elected for (2) years and three (3) members for four (4) years” as the penultimate sentence; rewrote (b)(ii), which formerly read: “To divide the district into director districts and provide for the election of a director from each district to be chosen by the voters; and”; in (b)(iii), deleted “To” at the beginning of the sentence; added (e); and made related changes.

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1950).

§ 35-9-203.
Powers and duties of board of directors generally; administration of finances; assessment and levy of taxes.

The board of directors of any fire protection district is hereby authorized to enact such ordinances as may be necessary to establish and operate a fire protection district and shall file them with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located. The board of directors of fire protection districts shall administer the finances of such districts according to the provisions of the Wyoming Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedure Act, except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required. Each fire protection district shall comply with the provisions of W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii). The assessor shall, at the time of making the annual assessment of his county, also assess the property of each fire protection district in his county and return to the county assessor at the time of returning the assessment schedules, separate schedules listing the property of each fire protection district assessed by him. The separate schedules shall be compiled by the county assessor, footed, and returned to the board of county commissioners as provided for other assessment schedules.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax for the year upon the taxable property in such district in its county for its proportionate share based on assessed valuation of the estimated amounts of funds needed by each district. In no case shall the tax for each district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of three (3) mills for operation on each dollar of assessed valuation of such property. There shall be no limit on the assessment for payment of principal and interest on bonds approved by the board of and the electors of the districts as provided in W.S.

35-9-204

. The taxes and assessments of all fire protection districts shall be collected by the county collector at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes are collected. The assessment and tax levied under the provisions of W.S.

35-9-201

through

35-9-209

shall not be construed as being a part of the general county mill levy.

A fire protection district formed pursuant to this act [§§

35-9-201

through

35-9-215

] may, as a condition for a position with the district, require applicants to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-439; Laws 1959, ch. 145, § 1; 1975, ch. 112, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 2006, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; 2019 ch. 184, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, substituted “protection district and shall file” for “department and shall file” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, added (c).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

added “except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required” at the end of the second sentence, and added the third sentence.

Effective date.—

Laws 2019, ch. 184, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Validity of tax levy. —

The county commissioners cannot levy a tax for operation and maintenance of a fire protection district, which tax when combined with general levy of the town exceeded eight mills, since fire protection is a primary governmental function which every city and town must perform. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 35-9-204.
Issuance of bonds; authority of board to submit questions to electors; restriction upon amount; interest; purpose.

The board of directors of a fire protection district is authorized, whenever a majority thereof so decide, to submit to the electors of the district the question whether the board shall be authorized to issue the coupon bonds of the district in a certain amount, not to exceed four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of taxable property in the district, and bearing a certain rate of interest, payable and redeemable at a certain time, not exceeding twenty-five (25) years for the purchase of real property, for the construction or purchase of improvements, and for equipment for fire protection district purposes.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-440; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 32; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2007, ch. 63, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions requiring voter approval and imposing limitation on debt, see art. 16, §§ 4, 8, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation of amount and redemption of bonds, see §§

16-5-301

to

16-5-303

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “four percent (4%)” for “two percent (2%)”.

§ 35-9-205.
Issuance of bonds; conduct of election; canvass of returns.

The election authorized under W.S.

35-9-204

shall be called, conducted and the results thereof canvassed and certified in all respects as near as practicable in the same manner as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-441; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to bond elections, see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

§ 35-9-206.
Issuance of bonds; notice; bids.

If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the board of directors must issue such bonds in such form as the board may direct and shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the counties in which said district is located and in some newspaper of general circulation in the capital of the state of its intention to issue and negotiate such bonds, and to invite bidders therefor; provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold for less than their full or par value and the accrued interest thereon at the time of their delivery. And the said trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to sell said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the best interests of the district.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-442.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 35-9-207.
Issuance of bonds; form of bonds; execution; registration.

After ascertaining the best terms upon and the lowest interest at which said bonds can be negotiated, the board shall secure the proper engraving and printing and consecutive numbering thereof, and said bonds shall thereupon be otherwise properly prepared and executed; they must bear the signature of the president of the board of directors and be countersigned by the secretary of the board and bear the district seal and be countersigned by the treasurer of the board, and the coupons attached to the bonds must be signed by the president, secretary and treasurer; and the secretary of the board shall endorse a certificate upon every such bond, that the same is within the lawful debt limit of such district and is issued according to law and he shall sign such certificate in his official character. When so executed they shall be registered by the county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept in a book provided for that purpose, which shall show the number, date, amount of bond, time and place of payment, rate of interest, number of coupons attached and any other proper description thereof for future identification.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-443.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring endorsement on bonds, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

§ 35-9-208.
Issuance of bonds; payment of principal and interest.

The county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept may pay out of any monies belonging to said district tax fund, and from the tax fund of a detracted district as provided in W.S. 35-9-215(b), the interest and the principal upon any bonds issued under this chapter by such district, when the same becomes due, upon the presentation at his office of the proper coupon or bond, which must show the amount due, and each coupon must also show the number of the bond to which it belonged, and all bonds and coupons so paid must be reported to the district directors at their first regular meeting thereafter.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-444; 2007, ch. 146, § 2.

The 2007 amendment

substituted “monies” for “moneys” preceding “belonging to said district” and inserted “, and from the tax fund of a detracted district as provided in W.S. 35-9-215(b)” preceding “the interest and the principal.”

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 35-9-209.
Procedure for proposing establishment of fire protection district.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A fire protection district may be established under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts, and subsequent elections shall be held, as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

Notwithstanding subsection (j) of this section, a fire protection district may be established through division of an existing fire protection district pursuant to W.S.

35-9-213

through

35-9-215

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 147, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 35-445; Laws 1959, ch. 145, § 2; 1967, ch. 49, § 1; 1973, ch. 73, § 1; 1983, ch. 40, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2007, ch. 146, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to qualification of electors, see §

22-3-102

.

For provisions relating to bond elections, see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

The 2007 amendment

added (k).

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-9-210.
District formation initiated by resolution of county commissioners; procedures; conditions.

A fire protection district comprised of lands within unincorporated areas of the county which are not within existing fire protection districts may be created under the following procedure:

The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, identify lands to be included within the proposed district and submit the question of establishing the district to the electors of the proposed district at the next general election. The board shall provide notice that it will consider a resolution under this paragraph at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting at which the resolution will be considered. Notice of the election shall be given as required by W.S.

22-29-110

;

If the establishment of the district is defeated at the election, the board may refuse to provide fire and public safety protection to the area within the proposed district commencing with the succeeding fiscal year. If a majority of the voters in the proposed district voting at the election vote for the establishment of the district, the board of county commissioners shall enter that fact upon its records and the district is established. The board shall hold an election for a district board of directors under W.S.

35-9-202

. Districts formed under this subsection are otherwise subject to W.S.

35-9-201

through

35-9-208

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 127, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2006, ch. 47, § 1; 2017 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “and public safety” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), added “The board shall provide notice that it will consider a resolution under this paragraph at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting at which the resolution will be considered” as the second sentence; in (a)(ii), deleted “Following establishment of the district” from the last sentence; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-9-211.
Formation of county commission fire protection districts; procedures; conditions.

As an alternative to the procedures provided by W.S.

35-9-210

, a county commission fire protection district comprised of lands within unincorporated areas of the county which are not within existing fire protection districts and which are currently receiving fire protection or public safety services from an existing fire department funded by the county may be created under the following procedure:

The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, identify lands to be included within the proposed county commission fire protection district and submit the question of establishing the district to the electors of the proposed district at the next general election. The board shall provide notice that it will consider a resolution brought pursuant to this paragraph at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting at which the resolution will be considered. Notice of the election to establish the district shall be given as required by W.S.

22-29-110

;

If the establishment of the district is defeated at the election, the board may refuse to provide fire and public safety protection to the area within the proposed district commencing with the succeeding fiscal year. If a majority of the voters in the proposed district voting at the election vote for the establishment of the district, the board of county commissioners shall enter that fact upon its records and the district is established. Following establishment of the district:

Pursuant to the assessed property valuation requirements of W.S.

35-9-202

(e) the board of county commissions shall appoint either three (3) or five (5) members to the board who are residents and property owners within the district and who shall serve on the board until the next election of directors, at which time the members of the board shall be elected in accordance with W.S.

35-9-202

;

The board of county commissioners shall annually levy a tax on the taxable property in the district as provided by W.S.

35-9-203

and shall expend the proceeds of the tax solely for the support of the fire department or agency providing fire protection or public safety services for the property within the district or outside the district pursuant to a mutual aid agreement as provided in W.S.

35-9-201

.

A county commission fire protection district created under this section may, as a condition for a position with the district, require applicants to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 102, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2006, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; 2007, ch. 29, § 1; 2017 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, inserted “or public safety services” or similar language in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, added (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii)(B) inserted “or outside the district pursuant to a mutual aid agreement as provided in
W.S.

35-9-201

.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), added “The board shall provide notice that it will consider a resolution brought pursuant to this paragraph at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting at which the resolution will be considered” as the second sentence, and “to establish the district” in the last sentence; in (a)(ii)(A), added “Pursuant to the assessed property valuation requirements of
W.S.

35-9-202

(e)” preceding “the board of county commissions,” and “either three (3) or five (5)” preceding “members of the board who are residents”; substituted “35-9-202” for “35-9-202(a)” in the last sentence; and made a related change.

§ 35-9-212.
Division of fire protection district authorized.

Fire protection districts may be divided as provided in W.S.

35-9-213

through

35-9-215

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 35-9-213.
Petition for division; hearing and notice.

Whenever a petition in writing is made to the county commissioners, signed by the owners of fifty percent (50%) or more of the privately owned lands of an area proposed to be detracted from the original fire protection district, who constitute fifty percent (50%) or more of the taxpayers within the proposed detracted area based upon the last completed assessment roll, the county commissioners shall, within twenty (20) days from the receipt of the petition, give notice of the hearing on the petition by:

Mailing a copy of the notice by first-class mail to each landowner in the district at the address shown in the assessment roll;

Causing a notice thereof to be posted, at least twenty (20) days prior to the time appointed by them for the consideration of the petition, in at least three (3) public places within the proposed detracted area and also in at least three (3) public places within the remaining area; and

Publishing a notice in the newspapers of general circulation in the area of the district.

The petition for detraction shall describe the boundaries of the proposed detracted area and the boundaries of the remaining area in the manner provided in W.S. 22-29-103(e).

The county commissioners shall, on the day fixed for hearing the petition, or on any legally postponed day, proceed to hear the petition. Prior to the hearing the commissioners shall appoint an individual or group of individuals from the persons signing the petition to act in negotiations on behalf of the proposed detracted area.

If the detracting district is within two (2) or more counties, the county commissioners for purposes of W.S.

35-9-213

and

35-9-214

are the county commissioners of the county where the majority of the detracting district property lies.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 35-9-214.
Decision on petition for division; protest.

The petition may be granted and the original districts may thereupon be divided into separate districts if at the time of the hearing on the petition the county commissioners determine:

Protests have not been signed by:

The owners of twenty percent (20%) or more of the area of the privately owned lands included within the entire original district who constitute twenty percent (20%) or more of the taxpayers who are landowners within the entire original district based upon the last completed assessment roll; or

The owners of twenty percent (20%) or more of the area of the privately owned lands included within the area of the proposed detracted area who constitute twenty percent (20%) or more of taxpayers who are landowners within the proposed detracted area based upon the last completed assessment roll.

The districts have in place standard operating procedures that ensure that both districts have the ability to provide fire protection to the satisfaction of the commissioners;

The boundary changes are in the best interests of the public; and

The mutual agreement negotiated pursuant to W.S. 35-9-215(a)(i) regarding the distribution of assets is acceptable to the commissioners.

If the required amount of protests are presented as provided in paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the petition for division shall be disallowed.

Upon allowance of a petition for division of a fire protection district, the board of county commissioners shall appoint members to the newly formed board who are residents and property owners within the newly formed district and who shall serve on the board until the initial election of directors, at which time the members of the board shall be elected in accordance with W.S. 35-9-202(a).

Until a board of directors for the newly formed district shall be appointed and until the first tax assessment is received by the newly formed district, the original fire protection district shall remain responsible for provision of fire protection services to the area encompassing the newly detracted fire protection district.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 35-9-215.
Distribution of assets and liabilities following division.

The division of the assets of the fire protection districts shall be apportioned as follows:

Through a mutual agreement signed by the president of the original fire protection district board and the person or persons appointed to represent the detracted district pursuant to W.S. 35-9-213(c);

If a mutual agreement cannot be reached as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection and the assets are located entirely within one (1) county, the board of county commissioners of that county may impose an equitable division of the assets;

If a mutual agreement cannot be reached as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection and the assets are located in more than one (1) county, the boards of county commissioners of the counties where the assets are located may negotiate a division of the assets, with each board having an equal vote regardless of the number of commissioners on the respective boards;

If a mutual agreement cannot be reached as provided in paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection, the district court of the county where a majority of the original district’s electors reside shall have jurisdiction to equitably divide the district assets, with each county responsible to pay legal fees and costs in proportion to the division of assets between or among the counties.

Any detracted area shall remain liable for any existing warrant and bonded indebtedness of the original district, which indebtedness shall be apportioned between the divided areas according to their respective taxable valuations.

New fire protection districts created by a division of a fire protection district pursuant to W.S.

35-9-212

through

35-9-215

shall not be treated as a new or reorganized taxing entity for purposes of W.S. 39-13-104(m).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 1; 2008, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2008, ch. 56 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 146, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 56, § 2 provides: “This act shall apply to all ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on any property on and after January 1, 2008.”